Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,220.03
Foreign corporation; surrender of foreign charter; effect.

If a foreign corporation which has domesticated pursuant to section 21-2,220.01 surrenders its foreign corporate charter, and files, records, and publishes notice of amended articles of incorporation in the manner, time, and places required by sections 21-219, 21-220, and 21-2,229, such foreign domesticated corporation shall thereupon become and be a domestic corporation organized under the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

Laws 2016, LB794, § 13.
January 1, 2017